Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF284.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2429YH (1) 91 jda/jh H.F. 284 Section 1. Section 8A.209, subsection 4, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraphs: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. Is not a dues-paying member of a 3 nonprofit organization that operates nationwide, promotes 4 federal and state legislation related to libraries, and engages 5 in advocacy efforts at the federal and state level. 6 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. Is not a dues-paying member of a 7 nonprofit organization that operates primarily within this 8 state, promotes federal and state legislation related to 9 libraries within this state, and engages in advocacy efforts at 10 the federal, state, and local level. 11